Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2211.03
Older individual, defined.

Older individual shall mean any individual who is sixty years of age or older, the spouse of an individual who is sixty years of age or older, or, for purposes of employment services, any individual who is fifty-five years of age or older.

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 13.